incubator/apertium-hi-ur.ur.dix
    <pardef n="حکایت__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="جج__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="اَ/مر__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>مر</l>
          <r>مر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>مر</l>
          <r>مر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وامِر</l>
          <r>مر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وامِر</l>
          <r>مر<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="رِیا__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ؤں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ئیں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="آب__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="آنت__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>و</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>وں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یں</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="آخرالزماں"><i>آخرالزماں</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نامراد"><i>نامراد</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="برسٹر"><i>برسٹر</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آغا"><i>آغا</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ڈائرکٹر"><i>ڈائرکٹر</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آثارالصنادید"><i>آثارالصنادید</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آفاقی"><i>آفاقی</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="قلمکار"><i>قلمکار</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پُلاؤ"><i>پُلاؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ڈبل"><i>ڈبل</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آب"><i>آب</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ہولاؤ"><i>ہولاؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ابھار"><i>ابھار</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آغاحشر"><i>آغاحشر</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="صابر"><i>صابر</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ڈھر"><i>ڈھر</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="الجھاؤ"><i>الجھاؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گریبان"><i>گریبان</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گنہگار"><i>گنہگار</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="تناؤ"><i>تناؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="امراؤ"><i>امراؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پہلوان"><i>پہلوان</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="زیور"><i>زیور</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آذاد"><i>آذاد</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آفریں"><i>آفریں</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="نوکر"><i>نوکر</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آبائی"><i>آبائی</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="عارف"><i>عارف</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مسافر"><i>مسافر</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گھیراؤ"><i>گھیراؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کوس"><i>کوس</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کاشتکار"><i>کاشتکار</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="راؤ"><i>راؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آخردماغ"><i>آخردماغ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="شیخ"><i>شیخ</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بھاڑ"><i>بھاڑ</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جتلاؤ"><i>جتلاؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بُزرگ"><i>بُزرگ</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آفاقیت"><i>آفاقیت</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="لشکر"><i>لشکر</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دستکار"><i>دستکار</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="غریب"><i>غریب</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="شاعری"><i>شاعری</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آخرالزمان"><i>آخرالزمان</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آخرکار"><i>آخرکار</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مباحث"><i>مباحث</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کنول"><i>کنول</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آڈیو"><i>آڈیو</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="فخر"><i>فخر</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="باؤ"><i>باؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="رِیا"><i>رِیا</i><par n="رِیا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آگیا"><i>آگیا</i><par n="رِیا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بول"><i>بول</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بدؤ"><i>بدؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گھناؤ"><i>گھناؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="قبائلی"><i>قبائلی</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دباؤ"><i>دباؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="چاؤ"><i>چاؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آْباد"><i>آْباد</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بجھاؤ"><i>بجھاؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دن"><i>دن</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="لکھنؤ"><i>لکھنؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="برتاؤ"><i>برتاؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آدرش"><i>آدرش</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بیٹ"><i>بیٹ</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آڈیوز"><i>آڈیوز</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="سوداگر"><i>سوداگر</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ظالم"><i>ظالم</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آنت"><i>آنت</i><par n="آنت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پتھراؤ"><i>پتھراؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ایکٹر"><i>ایکٹر</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="فیصل"><i>فیصل</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="حَیا"><i>حَیا</i><par n="رِیا__n"/></e>
    <e lm="حوال"><i>حوال</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گھاؤ"><i>گھاؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بکاؤ"><i>بکاؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بدنصیب"><i>بدنصیب</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="اَمر"><i>اَ</i><par n="اَ/مر__n"/></e>
    <e lm="انداز"><i>انداز</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="حکایت"><i>حکایت</i><par n="حکایت__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کھیل"><i>کھیل</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آثارِ"><i>آثارِ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کہار"><i>کہار</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بھائی"><i>بھائی</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="امیدوار"><i>امیدوار</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="سبھاؤ"><i>سبھاؤ</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
    <e lm="شق"><i>شق</i><par n="جج__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ہُمایُوں"><i>ہُمایُوں</i><par n="آب__n"/></e>
